Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.415

State internship program coordinator—Rules.

(1) The governor may appoint a coordinator to assist in administering the program created by RCW 43.06.410.

(2) The governor shall adopt such rules as are necessary to administer RCW 43.06.410.

[ 1985 c 442 s 2.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1985 c 442: See notes following RCW 43.06.410.